Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD

26.5-1-101. Short title.

The short title of this title 26.5 is the "Anna Jo Garcia Haynes Early Childhood Act".

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1846, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

26.5-1-102. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of early childhood shall work with other state and local agencies, public and private early childhood providers, head start agencies, nonprofit organizations, and parents and families to:

Provide high-quality, voluntary, affordable early childhood opportunities for all children in Colorado;

Coordinate the availability of early childhood programs and services in Colorado to meet the needs of all families;

Establish state and community partnerships that provide for a mixed delivery of child care and early childhood programs through school-based and community-based providers;

Ensure that parent and community input are prioritized in the continuing design and implementation of programs and policies affecting children and families;

Maximize the efficient use of resources to ensure that parents, children, and early childhood program and service providers are prioritized and receive the greatest level of investment and financial support with the lowest possible administrative burden;

Prioritize the equitable delivery of resources and supports for early childhood;

Unify within the department the administration of child care and early learning programs to effectively and efficiently support a streamlined parent and provider experience and to support a diverse array of providers of early childhood care and learning services. Unification of the programs must include:

Development of a common program application process, which, to the extent practicable, is accessible in families' preferred languages, to streamline the eligibility and enrollment experience for families;

Quality program standards that support child development and successful transitions to elementary education and are aligned and integrated with standards from other early care and learning programs; and

Focus on recruitment and retention strategies, including strategies designed to recruit and retain individuals from different cultural backgrounds, and compensation strategies for the early care and learning workforce to elevate and support the workforce across all care and learning settings; and

Improve outcomes for children and families through:

Strategies that support recruitment, training, and compensation of the early childhood workforce, including strategies designed to recruit and retain individuals from different cultural backgrounds;

Implementation of evidence- and practice-based best practices in education, family support, and child development with a focus on continuous improvement and innovation;

Program evaluation for continuous improvement, including monitoring metrics that promote transparency and efficiency of administration, program quality assessment, and child and family outcomes and accountability, which are reported annually and must address removal or reduction of access barriers, realization of administrative or financial efficiencies, and progress toward achieving the department's mission;

Alignment with state and federal requirements under the state "Exceptional Children's Educational Act", part 1 of article 20 of title 22, and part B and part C of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended; and

Education and training regarding how to identify and address child and family trauma and support a trauma-informed approach to early childhood.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1847, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

26.5-1-103. Definitions.

As used in this title 26.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of early childhood created in section 26.5-1-104.

"Department rule" means a rule promulgated by the executive director as authorized in section 26.5-1-105.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of early childhood.

"Local coordinating organization" means the entity selected by the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-103 to implement a community plan for increasing access to, coordinating, and allocating funding for early childhood and family support programs and services within a specified community.

"Rules advisory council" or "council" means the council convened by the executive director pursuant to section 26.5-1-105.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1848, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 566, § 1, effective April 25.

26.5-1-104. Department of early childhood - created - executive director - powers, duties, and functions.

There is created the department of early childhood, the head of which is the executive director of the department of early childhood, which office is created. The governor shall appoint the executive director, with the consent of the senate, and the executive director serves at the pleasure of the governor. The reappointment of an executive director after an initial election of a governor is subject to the provisions of section 24-20-109. In appointing an executive director, the governor shall make concerted efforts to identify qualified individuals who are representative of the diverse populations of children and families residing in Colorado. The executive director has those powers, duties, and functions prescribed for the heads of principal departments in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, and any powers, duties, and functions set forth in this title 26.5.

The department of early childhood consists of an executive director of the department of early childhood and such divisions, sections, other units, and advisory boards as the executive director may establish pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and as may be specified in this title 26.5.

The executive director may establish such divisions, sections, other units, and advisory boards within the department as are necessary for the proper and efficient discharge of the powers, duties, and functions of the department.

The department of early childhood is responsible for administering the functions and programs as set forth in this title 26.5.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire title added, (HB 21-1304), ch. 307, p. 1848, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(5) repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 775, § 5, effective July 1.

26.5-1-105. Powers and duties of the executive director - rules - rules advisory council - repeal.

The executive director is authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, all rules for the administration of the department and for the execution and administration of the functions specified in section 26.5-1-109 and for the programs and services specified in this title 26.5. In promulgating rules, the executive director shall, to the greatest extent possible:

Reduce the administrative burden on families and providers of accessing programs and services, implementing programs, and providing services;

Decrease duplication and conflicts in implementing programs and providing services;

Increase equity in access to programs and services and in child and family outcomes;

Increase administrative efficiencies among the programs and services provided by the department; and

Ensure that the rules are coordinated across programs and services so that programs are implemented and services are provided with improved ease of access, quality of family and provider experience, and ease of implementation by state, local, and tribal agencies.

The department may adopt guidelines and procedures to assist in the implementation and delivery of the programs and services that the department provides pursuant to this title 26.5. When appropriate to reduce potential administrative burden, the department may differentiate in the adopted guidelines and procedures among communities, including communities in rural areas, based on community capacity and readiness for implementing programs and delivering services.

This subsection (1) is repealed, effective September 1, 2024. Before the repeal, this subsection (1) is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

The executive director shall convene a rules advisory council for consultation and advice in promulgating rules for the functions, programs, and services that the department provides. The executive director shall appoint the members of the rules advisory council, taking into consideration a list of nominees provided by the early childhood leadership commission pursuant to this subsection (2)(a). To ensure that the council is representative and collaborative and embodies a wide range of perspectives and experience with regard to early childhood and family support programs and services, the early childhood leadership commission shall conduct outreach to a wide range of early childhood industry organizations and partners and shall publicly solicit applications from qualified and interested individuals to serve on the council. In addition to soliciting applications, the early childhood leadership commission shall consult with parents and with counties, county human services directors, school districts, providers, and the organizations that represent these entities and shall accept nominations from said organizations. Based on the applications and nominations received, the early childhood leadership commission shall submit to the executive director a list of nominees for consideration as appointments to the council. To the extent practicable, the list of nominees must include nominees that satisfy the requirements specified in subsections (2)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(d) of this section. The early childhood leadership commission shall submit a list of nominees to the executive director as provided in this subsection (2)(a) for the initial and subsequent appointments to the council.

The executive director shall appoint fifteen persons, taking into consideration the list of nominees received from the early childhood leadership commission, to serve on the council, which appointments must include at least one person from each of the following categories:

Representatives from programmatically diverse communities, including:

A representative from a school-based preschool provider;

A representative from a private early childhood provider, who may be a head start program or in-home child care provider; and

A representative who provides child care as a nonparental family member, friend, or neighbor;

Representatives of county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103, in diverse geographic areas of the state who are knowledgeable of and responsible for implementing child protection programs and the Colorado child care assistance program and have expertise in fiscal matters for county departments. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (2)(b) to the contrary, the executive director shall appoint at least two persons from the category described in this subsection (2)(b)(II).

A representative of a foundation, business, or early childhood advocacy organization;

A representative who is an expert in the funding for and rules and federal regulations concerning early childhood and family support programs and services, including the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to children with disabilities;

A representative of institutions of higher education; and

An early childhood health-care or mental health-care professional.

At least eight of the members appointed to the council must be included in one or more of the following categories:

Parents, families, or caregivers of children who are enrolled in a variety of school- and community-based preschool programs and public and private early childhood programs;

Members of the early childhood workforce, including educators in school- and community-based programs; and

Members of historically underserved and under-resourced communities.

In appointing members of the council, the executive director shall ensure that the appointed members are from regions throughout the state, including urban, suburban, and rural areas, and, to the extent practicable, are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, culture, and language.

Members of the council are appointed to serve four-year terms and may serve two consecutive terms; except that, of the members initially appointed to the council, the executive director shall appoint five members to serve two-year terms, five members to serve three-year terms, and five members to serve four-year terms. If a vacancy arises on the council, the executive director shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The executive director may create issue-specific subcommittees of the council that must include members of the council and may include representatives from other state agencies, representatives of local and tribal agencies or other local leaders in early childhood and family support issues, and issue experts.

There is created a county subcommittee of the rules advisory council to provide information and advice to the council concerning the development and implementation of early childhood and family support programs that impact county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103, including the Colorado child care assistance program. The subcommittee consists of representatives from up to twelve county departments, appointed by a statewide association of human services directors. The appointees must be representative of the diversity of counties in the state, including large and small and urban and rural counties. In addition to providing information and advice to the council, the county subcommittee, to promote coordination and alignment of programs and services, shall provide information and advice to the policy advisory committee that advises the department of human services.

The council shall meet as often as requested by the executive director. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(h)(II) of this section, a member of the council and a non-council member who serves on a subcommittee may receive the same per diem compensation for attendance at council or subcommittee meetings as is provided for members of boards and commissions pursuant to section 12-20-103 (6) and reimbursement for any expenses necessary to support the member's participation at a council or subcommittee meeting, including any required dependent or attendant care and, if the member resides more than fifty miles from the location of the council or subcommittee meeting, expenses incurred in traveling to and from the meeting, including any required dependent or attendant travel, food, and lodging.

A member of the council or of a subcommittee shall not receive reimbursement for expenses or per diem compensation if the member's employer compensates the member for time spent serving on the council or the subcommittee.

In reviewing and making recommendations concerning rules and in preparing other recommendations for the executive director, the council shall strive to develop recommendations that are detailed and measurable and consider the impacts on children, parents, families, providers, school districts, counties, and local coordinating organizations. The council must approve recommendations by a majority vote and provide those recommendations to the executive director in writing. Members of the council voting in the minority may submit a written explanation of their opposition to the recommendations to the executive director.

Before promulgating a rule, the executive director shall solicit feedback from and consider the recommendations of the council. If the executive director decides not to follow the recommendations of the council with regard to a rule, the executive director shall provide a written explanation of the rationale for the decision.

The council is a state public body for purposes of the open meetings law specified in section 24-6-402 and is subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective July 1, 2032. Before the repeal, this subsection (2) is scheduled for review in accordance with section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 567, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-106. Transfer of functions - employees - property - contracts.

On and after July 1, 2022, the department is responsible for executing, administering, performing, and enforcing the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested before July 1, 2022, in:
(1) (a) (I) On and after July 1, 2022, the department is responsible for executing, administering, performing, and enforcing the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested before July 1, 2022, in:

The office within the department of human services that is responsible for early childhood programs and services; and

The department of education concerning early childhood workforce development, including the professional development information system.

The rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations concerning a statewide preschool program are transferred, effective July 1, 2022, to the department to the extent necessary to establish and authorize enrollment in the Colorado universal preschool program, as provided in part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5 for the 2023-24 school year, and are fully transferred to the department, effective July 1, 2023. The department of education retains such rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations as are necessary to operate the existing Colorado preschool program pursuant to article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, for the 2022-23 school year.

The department shall enter into memoranda of understanding, interagency agreements, or both, as appropriate, with the department of human services and the department of education to provide for the timely transfer of powers, duties, personnel, property, records, appropriations, and other funding as necessary to accomplish the complete transfer of the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations to the department as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The rules pertaining to the powers, duties, functions, and obligations transferred to the department pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section that are adopted by the department of human services, the state board of human services, or the state board of education and are in effect as of July 1, 2022, continue in effect and apply to the department and persons or entities licensed or providing services pursuant to this title 26.5 until replaced by rules adopted by the executive director pursuant to section 26.5-1-105.

Beginning July 1, 2022, the positions of employment in the department of human services and the department of education concerning the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the department of early childhood pursuant to this part 1 and determined by the executive director to be necessary to carry out the purposes of this title 26.5, including positions of employment related to technology support, are transferred to the department of early childhood and become positions of employment in that department. The executive director, or the executive director's designee, shall establish the actual date of said transfers in memoranda of understanding, interagency agreements, or both, as appropriate, entered into between the department of early childhood and the department of human services or the department of education, as applicable, pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Beginning July 1, 2022, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, records, and information systems with the supporting hardware, software, licenses, and data, of the department of human services and the department of education pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the department of early childhood pursuant to this part 1 are transferred to the department of early childhood and become the property of said department. The executive director, or the executive director's designee, shall establish the actual date of said transfers in memoranda of understanding, interagency agreements, or both, as appropriate, entered into between the department of early childhood and the department of human services or the department of education, as applicable, pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Effective July 1, 2022, if the department of human services or the department of education is referred to or designated by a contract or other document in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the department of early childhood pursuant to this part 1, such reference or designation is deemed to apply to the department of early childhood. All contracts entered into by the said departments before July 1, 2022, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the department of early childhood pursuant to this part 1 are hereby validated, with the department of early childhood succeeding to all rights and obligations under said contracts. Any money that was previously received or appropriated, and remains available, to satisfy obligations incurred under said contracts is transferred and further appropriated to the department of early childhood for the payment of said obligations.

On and after July 1, 2022, unless otherwise specified, if a provision of law refers to the department of human services with regard to the powers, duties, or functions specified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section or to the department of education with regard to the powers, duties, or functions specified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(B) or (1)(a)(II) of this section, said law is construed as referring to the department of early childhood.

On and after July 1, 2022, unless otherwise specified, all claims and liabilities, including costs, relating to the performance of the department of human services with regard to the powers, duties, or functions specified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section or to the department of education with regard to the powers, duties, or functions specified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(B) or (1)(a)(II) of this section are transferred to and assumed by the department of early childhood, exclusively through the department of early childhood, and no other public entity or agency is responsible or liable for any such claims, liabilities, or damages.

The executive director, or the executive director's designee, may accept, on behalf of and in the name of the state, gifts, grants, and donations for any purpose connected with the powers, duties, and functions of the department. The state treasurer shall hold any property so given, but the executive director, or the executive director's designee, may direct the disposition of any property so given for any purpose consistent with the terms and conditions under which the gift was created.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 571, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-107. Final agency action - authority of executive director - rules.

Hearings conducted by an appointed administrative law judge are considered initial decisions of the department that the executive director, or an executive director's designee, shall review. If exceptions to the initial decision are filed pursuant to section 24-4-105 (14)(a)(I), the review must be in accordance with section 24-4-105 (15); except that the department may, at its discretion, permit a party to file an audio recording in lieu of a written transcript if the party cannot afford a written transcript. The executive director may adopt rules delineating the criteria and process for filing an audio recording in lieu of a written transcript. In the absence of an exception filed pursuant to section 24-4-105 (14)(a)(I), the executive director shall review the initial decision in accordance with a procedure adopted by the executive director. The procedure must be consistent with federal mandates concerning the single state agency requirement. Review by the executive director in accordance with section 24-4-105 (15) or the procedure adopted by the executive director pursuant to this section constitutes final agency action.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 573, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-108. Cooperation with federal government - grants-in-aid - legislative intent.

The department is authorized to accept, use, and administer all money and property granted or made available to the state or any state agency for the purpose of the early childhood programs and services that are transferred to the department pursuant to this part 1 or subsequently created in this title 26.5 or other programs and services that are comparable to said programs and services, except any money and property that is granted or made available to another specifically designated agency.

If it is necessary to execute a formal agreement with a federal agency or officer as a condition precedent to receiving federal money or property pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the department is authorized to execute such an agreement, with the approval of the attorney general, so long as the agreement is not inconsistent with law.

The state treasurer is authorized to receive, as official custodian, any money that the department accepts pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall disburse the money received pursuant to this section upon the order of the executive director.

Beginning with the presentation made to a joint committee of reference pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, in the 2023 regular legislative session, the department shall annually include in the presentation a report that details the total amount of federal money that the department received in the prior fiscal year, accounting for how the money was used, specifying the federal law or regulation that governs the use of the federal money, if any, and providing information regarding any flexibility the department has in using the federal money. The department shall make the report publicly available following the hearing.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the responsibility for administering and the power to expend federal money pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions that are transferred to the department pursuant to this part 1 transfer to the department in accordance with the memoranda of understanding, interagency agreements, or both, as appropriate, described in section 26.5-1-106 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 573, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-109. Department functions - operating principles.

The department shall execute the following functions and operate programs and provide services associated with those functions as described in this title 26.5 and authorized by federal law:

Promote child physical, oral, and behavioral health and use multigenerational and culturally and linguistically appropriate strategies to support child and parent outcomes that improve overall family well-being;

Identify and address child and family trauma and support a trauma-informed, as defined in section 19-1-103, approach to early childhood;

Provide support to families for healthy early childhood development;

Promote access to quality early childhood care and education, including monitoring and increasing the capacity of quality early childhood care and education programs to support the availability of said programs for children throughout the state;

Promote and support access to a coherent and aligned system of preparation and ongoing professional development opportunities for persons who provide early childhood and family support programs and services;

Support state and local infrastructure for providing early childhood and family support programs and services, including early childhood care and education and physical, oral, and behavioral health care for children;

Collaborate formally and informally with all state departments and local and tribal agencies that administer or otherwise provide support for early childhood and family support programs and services to ensure effective and efficient administration of said programs and services, including combining and coordinating the funding for said programs and services that are under the jurisdiction of the department to the fullest extent allowed under state and federal laws and regulations, and to ensure consistency in the experience of families who benefit from these programs and services and promote whole-child and whole-family well-being;

Collaborate with other state departments and local and tribal agencies to set, and assess achievement of, statewide goals for quality, availability, capacity, and delivery of early childhood and family support programs and services and statewide goals for support and development of the workforce that provides early childhood and family support programs and services, including physical, oral, and behavioral health care for children;

Collaborate with other state departments, local and tribal agencies, and local coordinating organizations to safely collect and share data, eliminating duplication of data collection when possible, while ensuring privacy and security for children and families, to enable the department to gauge the statewide quality, availability, capacity, and delivery of early childhood and family support programs and services;

Evaluate the quality of early childhood and family support programs and services throughout the state using identified outcome metrics and provide support for early childhood providers and the workforce that provides early childhood and family support programs and services, including physical, oral, and behavioral health care for children;

Collaborate with other state departments to promote the overall effectiveness of early childhood systems in the state by jointly identifying metrics that all departments use to monitor early childhood outcomes throughout the state, which must include outcomes in health, including physical, social-emotional, and dental; learning; and overall well-being;

Support innovation in methods and strategies for accessing and providing early childhood and family support programs and services through research and review of programs and systems implemented within Colorado and in other states and countries; and

In coordination with the department of human services and county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103, integrate outreach for early childhood and family support programs and services into efforts to provide families access to a wide range of services and resources, including access to food, cash assistance, and health care.

In executing the functions described in subsection (1) of this section and implementing the programs and providing the services related to those functions, the department shall ensure to the greatest extent possible that:

Early childhood and family support programs and services are:

Implemented and provided across functions rather than being siloed as individual programs, which includes providing a seamless application experience for families and providers as described in section 26.5-1-110, increasing the efficiency of programs and services, and reducing duplication and administrative burden;

Designed with a focus on the user experience of families, children, providers, and other end-users and designed to serve the whole family and the whole child;

Available statewide and provided on an equitable, affordable, and culturally and linguistically responsive basis to all families who choose to use the programs and services;

With regard to early childhood programs and services, provided through child care providers; a mixed delivery system of school- and community-based preschool program providers; and a diverse workforce of licensed, voluntarily credentialed, and informal childhood caregivers and educators; and

With regard to family support programs and services, provided through a mixed delivery system of public and private providers and a diverse workforce; and

Funding for programs and services is combined and coordinated at the state level, when possible and to the fullest extent allowed under state and federal laws and regulations, before distribution to local and tribal agencies, families, and providers; and

Resources are used with maximum efficiency to ensure that parents, children, and early childhood program and service providers are prioritized and receive the greatest possible level of investment and financial support with the lowest possible level of administrative burden; and

The department works in partnership with families, public and private providers, and local early childhood communities.

To assist the department in executing the functions and meeting the requirements specified in this section, the executive director shall ensure that there is at least one staff member among the upper management levels of the department whose job responsibilities include ensuring that staff support and communicate, interact, and partner with the counties and the county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103.

In executing the functions described in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall collaborate with the departments of education, higher education, human services, public health and environment, and health care policy and financing to strengthen coordination and promote alignment among education, higher education, human services, health care, and mental health care in serving and supporting children, families, providers, and the early childhood workforce.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 574, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-110. Unified application - child care, services, and education.

The department shall develop and implement the use of a single, unified electronic application for families to use in applying for all publicly funded early childhood programs and services that the department administers. The department shall design the application to enable equitable access; streamline the enrollment and eligibility-determination process for families, providers, and state, local, and tribal agencies; and meet the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall collaborate with other state, local, and tribal agencies as necessary in developing, and collecting feedback concerning, the application to ensure the least amount of duplication for families and state, local, and tribal agencies. The department shall ensure that the application is functional by July 1, 2023, for families seeking to enroll children in the Colorado universal preschool program pursuant to part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5.

At a minimum, the unified application must:

Be available in multiple languages;

Be accessible on mobile electronic devices and available in paper copy;

Collect from families only the minimum information necessary to apply for programs and services and enable families to apply for a single program or service or for multiple programs and services simultaneously or over time;

Adhere to all state and federal data privacy and security laws and regulations;

Reduce duplication in and the complexity of the information collected from providers;

Include consideration of all sources from which the applicant may be eligible for funding to ensure that all of the funding for which the applicant is eligible is combined and coordinated to the fullest extent allowed under state and federal laws and regulations in providing the programs and services for which the applicant is applying;

Allow for customization as may be necessary for certain programs or services; and

Coordinate with other agencies and programs, as appropriate, to ensure appropriate referral of children and families to early childhood programs administered by other departments.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 577, § 2, effective April 25.